Oklahoma, session 2026, SB374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-116.7 of Title 70, unless

there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. Upon the effective date of this act and until March 31,

2027, the Accreditation Standards Division of the State Department

of Education shall be placed under the authority of the Commission

for Educational Quality and Accountability. Except as otherwise

Req. No. 912 Page 2

prov ided for in this section, the transfer shall include all records

associated with the Accreditation Standards Division.

B. Upon the effective date of this act, all employees of the

Accreditation Standards Division of the State Department of

Education, shall remain under the State Department of Education and

shall, until March 31, 2027, make reports and recommendations

regarding accreditation to the Commission.

C. The Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability

shall succeed to any contractual rights and responsibilities

incurred by the Accreditation Standards Division of the State

Department of Education.

D. The rules of the State Board of Education relating to

accreditation of schools in this state that are in effect on the

effective date of this act, shall be enforceable by the Commission

for Educational Quality and Accountability until March 31, 2027.

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-104, as

last amended by Section 2, Chapter 445, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.

2024, Section 3-104), is amended to read as follows:

Section 3-104. A. The supervision of the public school system

of Oklahoma shall be vested in the State Board of Education and,

subject to limitations otherwise provided by law, the State Board of

Education shall:

1. Adopt policies and make rules for the operation of the

public school system of the state;

Req. No. 912 Page 3

2. Appoint, prescribe the duties, and fix the compensation of a

secretary, an attorney, and all other personnel necessary for the

proper performance of the functions of the State Board of Education.

The secretary shall not be a member of the Board;

3. Submit to the Governor a departmental budget based upon

major functions of the State Department of Education as prepared by

the Superintendent of Public Instruction and supported by detailed

data on needs and proposed operations as partially determined by the

budgetary needs of local school districts filed with the State Board

of Education for the ensuing fiscal year. Appropriations therefor

shall be made in lump-sum form for each major item in the budget as

follows:

a. State Aid to schools,

b. the supervision of all other functions of general and

special education including general control, free

textbooks, school lunch, Indian education, and all

other functions of the Board and an amount sufficient

to adequately staff and administer these services, and

c. the Board shall determine the details by which the

budget and the appropriations are administered.

Annually, the Board shall make preparations to

consolidate all of the functions of the Department in

such a way that the budget can be based on two items,

administration and aid to schools. A maximum amount

Req. No. 912 Page 4

for administration shall be designated as a part of

the total appropriation;

4. On the first day of December preceding each regular session

of the Legislature, prepare and deliver electronically to the

Governor and the Legislature a report for the year ending June 30

immediately preceding the regular session of the Legislature. The

report shall contain:

a. detailed statistics and other information concerning

enrollment, attendance, expenditures including State

Aid, and other pertinent data for all public schools

in this state,

b. reports from each and every division within the State

Department of Education as submitted by the

Superintendent of Public Instruction and any other

division, department, institution, or other agency

under the supervision of the Board,

c. recommendations for the improvement of the public

school system of the state,

d. a statement of the receipts and expenditures of the

State Board of Education for the past year, and

e. a statement of plans and recommendations for the

management and improvement of public schools and such

other information relating to the educational



Req. No. 912 Page 5

interests of the state as may be deemed necessary and

desirable;

5. Provide for the formulation and adoption of curricula,

courses of study, and other instructional aids necessary for the

adequate instruction of pupils in the public schools;

6. Have authority in matters pertaining to the licensure and

certification of persons for instructional, supervisory, and

administrative positions and services in the public schools of the

state subject to the provisions of Section 6-184 of this title, and

shall formulate rules governing the issuance and revocation of

certificates for superintendents of schools, principals,

supervisors, librarians, clerical employees, school nurses, school

bus drivers, visiting teachers, classroom teachers, and for other

personnel performing instructional, administrative, and supervisory

services, but not including members of boards of education and other

employees who do not work directly with pupils, and may charge and

collect reasonable fees for the issuance of such certificates:

a. the State Department of Education shall not issue a

certificate to and shall revoke the certificate of any

person who has been convicted, whether upon a verdict

or plea of guilty or upon a plea of nolo contendere,

or received a suspended sentence or any probationary

term for a crime or an attempt to commit a crime

provided for in Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the

Req. No. 912 Page 6

Oklahoma Statutes if the offense involved sexual abuse

or sexual exploitation as those terms are defined in

Section 1-1-105 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes,

Section 741, 843.1, if the offense included sexual

abuse or sexual exploitation, 865 et seq., 885, 888,

891, 1021, 1021.2, 1021.3, 1040.13a, 1087, 1088,

1111.1, 1114, or 1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma

Statutes or who enters this state and who has been

convicted, received a suspended sentence, or received

a deferred judgment for a crime or attempted crime

which, if committed or attempted in this state, would

be a crime or an attempt to commit a crime provided

for in any of the laws, and

b. all funds collected by the State Department of

Education for the issuance of certificates to

instructional, supervisory, and administrative

personnel in the public schools of the state shall be

deposited in the “Teachers’ Certification Fund” in the

State Treasury and may be expended by the State Board

of Education to finance the activities of the State

Department of Education necessary to administer the

program, for consultative services, publication costs,

actual and necessary travel expenses as provided in

the State Travel Reimbursement Act incurred by persons

Req. No. 912 Page 7

performing research work, and other expenses found

necessary by the State Board of Education for the

improvement of the preparation and certification of

teachers in this state. Provided, any unobligated

balance in the Teachers’ Certification Fund in excess

of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) on June 30 of any

fiscal year shall be transferred to the General

Revenue Fund of this state. Until July 1, 1997, the

State Board of Education shall have authority for

approval of teacher education programs. The State

Board of Education shall also have authority for the

administration of teacher residency and professional

development, subject to the provisions of the Oklahoma

Teacher Preparation Act;

7. Promulgate rules governing the classification, inspection,

and supervision, and accrediting of all public nursery,

kindergarten, elementary, and secondary schools, and on-site

educational services provided by public school districts or state-

accredited private schools in partial hospitalization programs, day

treatment programs, and day hospital programs as defined in this

section, Section 3-104.7 of this title, and Section 603.4 175.20 of

Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes for persons between the ages of

three (3) and twenty-one (21) years of age in the state. Beginning

on the effective date of this act until March 31, 2027, the

Req. No. 912 Page 8

Comm ission for Educational Quality and Accountability shall enforce

rules governing the accreditation of all public nursery,

kindergarten, elementary, and secondary schools, and on-site

educational services provided by public school districts or state-

accredited private schools in partial hospitalization programs, day

treatment programs, and day hospital programs as defined in Section

3-104.7 of this title and Section 175.20 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma

Statutes for persons between the ages of three (3) and twenty-one

(21) years of age in this state. Beginning April 1, 2027, the Board

shall promulgate rules governing the accrediting of all public

nursery, kindergarten, elementary, and secondary schools, and on-

site educational services provided by public school districts or

state-accredited private schools in partial hospitalization

programs, day treatment programs, and day hospital programs as

defined in Section 3-104.7 of this title and Section 175.20 of Title

10 of the Oklahoma Statutes for persons between the ages of three

(3) and twenty-one (21) years of age in the state. However,

beginning on the effective date of this act until March 31, 2027, no

school shall be denied accreditation by the Commission for

Educational Quality and Accountability solely on the basis of

average daily attendance. Beginning April 1, 2027, no school shall

be denied accreditation by the Board solely on the basis of average

daily attendance.



Req. No. 912 Page 9

Any school district which maintains an elementary school and

faces the necessity of relocating its school facilities because of

construction of a lake, either by state or federal authority, which

will inundate the school facilities, shall be entitled to receive

probationary accreditation from the Commission for Educational

Quality and Accountability beginning on the effective date of this

act, and beginning April 1, 2027, from the State Board of Education

for a period of five (5) years after June 12, 1975, and any school

district, otherwise qualified, shall be entitled to receive

probationary accreditation from the Commission until March 31, 2027,

and beginning April 1, 2027, from the State Board of Education for a

period of two (2) consecutive years to attain the minimum average

daily attendance. The Head Start and public nurseries or

kindergartens operated from community action agency funds shall not

be subjected to the accrediting rules of the Commission until March

31, 2027, and beginning April 1, 2027, from the State Board of

Education. Neither will the Commission until March 31, 2027, and

beginning April 1, 2027, neither will the State Board of Education

make rules affecting the operation of the public nurseries and

kindergartens operated from federal funds secured through community

action agencies even though they may be operating in the public

schools of the state. However, any of the Head Start or public

nurseries or kindergartens operated under federal regulations may

make application for accrediting from the Commission until March 31,

Req. No. 912 Page 10

2027 , and beginning April 1, 2027, from the State Board of Education

but will be accredited only if application for the approval of the

programs is made. The status of no school district shall be changed

which will reduce it to a lower classification until due notice has

been given to the proper authorities thereof and an opportunity

given to correct the conditions which otherwise would be the cause

of such reduction.

Private and parochial schools may be accredited and classified

in like manner as public schools or, if an accrediting association

is approved by the State Board of Education, by procedures

established by the State Board of Education to accept accreditation

by such accrediting association, if application is made to the State

Board of Education for such accrediting;

8. Be the legal agent of this state to accept, in its

discretion, the provisions of any Act of Congress appropriating or

apportioning funds which are now, or may hereafter be, provided for

use in connection with any phase of the system of public education

in Oklahoma. It shall prescribe such rules as it finds necessary to

provide for the proper distribution of such funds in accordance with

the state and federal laws;

9. Be and is specifically hereby designated as the agency of

this state to cooperate and deal with any officer, board, or

authority of the United States Government under any law of the

United States which may require or recommend cooperation with any

Req. No. 912 Page 11

stat e board having charge of the administration of public schools

unless otherwise provided by law;

10. Be and is hereby designated as the “State Educational

Agency” state educational agency referred to in Public Law 396 of

the 79th Congress of the United States, as amended, which law states

that the act may be cited known as the “National Richard B. Russell

National School Lunch Act” Act, and the State Board of Education is

hereby authorized and directed to accept the terms and provisions of

the act and to enter into such agreements, not in conflict with the

Constitution of Oklahoma or the Constitution and Statutes of the

United States, as may be necessary or appropriate to secure for this

state the benefits of the school lunch program established and

referred to in the act;

11. Have authority to secure and administer the benefits of the

Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act, Public Law 396 of the

79th Congress of the United States, as amended, in this state and is

hereby authorized to employ or appoint and fix the compensation of

such additional officers or employees and to incur such expenses as

may be necessary for the accomplishment of the above purpose, and

administer the distribution of any state funds appropriated by the

Legislature required as federal matching to reimburse on children’s

meals;

12. Accept and provide for the administration of any land,

money, buildings, gifts, donation donations, or other things of

Req. No. 912 Page 12

valu e which may be offered or bequeathed to the schools under the

supervision or control of the Board;

13. Have authority to require persons having administrative

control of all school districts in Oklahoma to make such regular and

special reports regarding the activities of the schools in the

districts as the Board may deem needful for the proper exercise of

its duties and functions. Such authority shall include the right of

the State Board of Education to withhold all state funds under its

control, and to withhold official recognition including accrediting,

until such required reports have been filed and accepted in the

office of the Board and to revoke the certificates of persons

failing or refusing to make such reports. Until March 31, 2027, the

Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability, and beginning

April 1, 2027, the State Board of Education shall have the authority

to withhold accreditation until such required reports have been

filed and accepted and to revoke the certificates of persons failing

or refusing to make such reports;

14. Have general supervision of the school lunch program. The

State Board of Education may sponsor workshops for personnel and

participants in the school lunch program and may develop, print, and

distribute free of charge or sell any materials, books, and

bulletins to be used in the school lunch programs. There is hereby

created in the State Treasury a revolving fund for the Board, to be

designated the “School Lunch Workshop Revolving Fund”. The fund

Req. No. 912 Page 13

shal l consist of all fees derived from or on behalf of any

participant in any such workshop sponsored by the State Board of

Education, or from the sale of any materials, books, and bulletins,

and funds shall be disbursed for expenses of such workshops and for

developing, printing, and distributing of the materials, books, and

bulletins relating to the school lunch program. The fund shall be

administered in accordance with Section 155 of Title 62 of the

Oklahoma Statutes;

15. Prescribe all forms for school district and county officers

to report to the State Board of Education where required. The State

Board of Education shall also prescribe a list of appropriation

accounts by which the funds of school districts shall be budgeted,

accounted for, and expended; and it shall be the duty of the State

Auditor and Inspector in prescribing all budgeting, accounting, and

reporting forms for school funds to conform to such lists;

16. Provide for the establishment of a uniform system of pupil

and personnel accounting, records, and reports;

17. Have authority to provide for the health and safety of

school children and school personnel while under the jurisdiction of

school authorities;

18. Provide for the supervision of the transportation of

pupils;





Req. No. 912 Page 14

19. Have authority, upon request of the local school board, to

act in behalf of the public schools of the state in the purchase of

transportation equipment;

20. Have authority and is hereby required to perform all duties

necessary to the administration of the public school system in

Oklahoma as specified in the Oklahoma School Code; and, in addition

thereto, those duties not specifically mentioned herein if not

delegated by law to any other agency or official;

21. Administer the State Public Common School Building

Equalization Fund established by Section 32 of Article X of the

Oklahoma Constitution. Any monies as may be appropriated or

designated by the Legislature, other than ad valorem taxes, any

other funds identified by the State Department of Education, which

may include, but not be limited to, grants-in-aid from the federal

government for building purposes, the proceeds of all property that

shall fall to the state by escheat, penalties for unlawful holding

of real estate by corporations, and capital gains on assets of the

permanent school funds, shall be deposited in the State Public

Common School Building Equalization Fund. The fund shall be used to

aid school districts and charter schools in acquiring buildings,

subject to the limitations fixed by Section 32 of Article X of the

Oklahoma Constitution. It is hereby declared that redbud school

grants disbursed from the State Public Common School Building

Equalization Fund shall be used for the same purposes as a building

Req. No. 912 Page 15

fund , as provided for in Section 1-118 of this title. It is hereby

declared that the term “school districts” as used in Section 32 of

Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution shall mean school districts

and eligible charter schools as defined in subsection B of this

section. The State Board of Education shall disburse redbud school

grants annually from the State Public Common School Building

Equalization Fund to public schools and eligible charter schools

pursuant to subsection B of this section. The Board shall

promulgate rules for the implementation of disbursing redbud school

grants pursuant to this section. The State Board of Education shall

prescribe rules for making grants of aid from, and for otherwise

administering, the fund pursuant to the provisions of this

paragraph, and may employ and fix the duties and compensation of

technicians, aides, clerks, stenographers, attorneys, and other

personnel deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this

paragraph. The cost of administering the fund shall be paid from

monies appropriated to the State Board of Education for the

operation of the State Department of Education. From monies

apportioned to the fund, the State Department of Education may

reserve not more than one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) for

purposes of administering the fund;

22. Recognize that the Director of the Department of

Corrections shall be the administrative authority for the schools

which are maintained in the state reformatories and shall appoint

Req. No. 912 Page 16

the principals and teachers in such schools. Provided, that rules

of the State Board of Education for the classification, and

inspection, and accreditation of public schools shall be applicable

to such schools; and such schools shall comply with standards set

rules adopted by the State Board of Education. Until March 31,

2027, the rules of the Commission for Educational Quality and

Accountability, and beginning April 1, 2027, the rules of the Board

for accreditation of public schools shall be applicable to such

schools; and

23. Have authority to administer a revolving fund which is

hereby created in the State Treasury, to be designated the

“Statistical Services Revolving Fund”. The fund shall consist of

all monies received from the various school districts of the state,

the United States Government, and other sources for the purpose of

furnishing or financing statistical services and for any other

purpose as designated by the Legislature. The State Board of

Education is hereby authorized to enter into agreements with school

districts, municipalities, the United States Government,

foundations, and other agencies or individuals for services,

programs, or research projects. The Statistical Services Revolving

Fund shall be administered in accordance with Section 155 of Title

62 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

B. 1. The redbud school grants shall be determined by the

State Department of Education as follows:

Req. No. 912 Page 17

a. divide the county four-mill levy revenue by four to

determine the nonchargeable county four-mill revenue

for each school district,

b. determine the amount of new revenue generated by the

five-mill building fund levy as authorized by Section

10 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution for each

school district as reported in the Oklahoma Cost

Accounting System for the preceding fiscal year,

c. add the amounts calculated in subparagraphs a and b of

this paragraph to determine the nonchargeable millage

for each school district,

d. add the nonchargeable millage in each district

statewide as calculated in subparagraph c of this

paragraph and divide the total by the average daily

membership in public schools statewide based on the

preceding school year’s average daily membership,

according to the provisions of Section 18-107 of this

title. This amount is the statewide nonchargeable

millage per student, known as the baseline local

funding per student,

e. all eligible charter schools shall be included in

these calculations as unique school districts,

separate from the school district that may sponsor the

eligible charter school, and the total number of

Req. No. 912 Page 18

districts shall be used to determine the statewide

average baseline local funding per student,

f. for each school district or eligible charter school

which is below the baseline local funding per student,

the Department shall subtract the baseline local

funding per student from the average nonchargeable

millage per student of the school district or eligible

charter school to determine the nonchargeable millage

per student shortfall for each district, and

g. the nonchargeable millage per student shortfall for a

school district or eligible charter school shall be

multiplied by the average daily membership of the

preceding school year of the eligible school district

or eligible charter school. This amount shall be the

redbud school grant amount for the school district or

eligible charter school.

2. For fiscal year 2022, monies for the redbud school grants

shall be expended from the funds apportioned pursuant to Section 426

of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes. For fiscal year 2023 and each

subsequent fiscal year, monies for the redbud school grants shall be

appropriated pursuant to Section 426 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma

Statutes, not to exceed three-fourths (3/4) of the tax collected in

the preceding fiscal year pursuant to Section 426 of Title 63 of the

Oklahoma Statutes as determined by the Oklahoma Tax Commission. For

Req. No. 912 Page 19

fisc al year 2023 and each subsequent fiscal year, if such

appropriated funds are insufficient to fund the redbud school

grants, then an additional apportionment of funds shall be made from

sales tax collections as provided by subsection D of Section 1353 of

Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes. If both funds are insufficient,

the Department shall promulgate rules to permit a decrease to the

baseline local funding per student to the highest amount allowed

with the funding available.

3. As used in this section, “eligible charter school” shall

mean a charter school which is sponsored pursuant to the provisions

of the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act. Provided, however, eligible

charter school shall not include a statewide virtual charter school

sponsored by the Statewide Charter School Board but shall only

include those which provide in-person or blended instruction, as

provided by Section 1-111 of this title, to not less than two-thirds

(2/3) of students as the primary means of instructional service

delivery.

4. The Department shall develop a program to acknowledge the

redbud school grant recipients and shall include elected members of

the House of Representatives and Senate who represent the school

districts and eligible charter schools.

5. The Department shall create a dedicated page on its website

listing annual redbud school grant recipients, amount awarded to



Req. No. 912 Page 20

each recipient, and other pertinent information about the Redbud

School Funding Act.

6. The Department shall provide the chair of the House

Appropriations and Budget Committee and the chair of the Senate

Appropriations Committee no later than February 1 of each year with

an estimate of the upcoming year’s redbud school grant allocation as

prescribed by this section.

SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-104.3, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 3-104.3. A. The Legislature, recognizing its

obligation to the children of this state to ensure their opportunity

to receive an excellent education, and recognizing its obligation to

the taxpayers of this state to ensure that schooling is accomplished

in an efficient manner, hereby establishes requirements for

compliance with quality standards which the public schools and

school districts, within the limits of resources now or subsequently

available, must meet.

B. State accreditation shall be withdrawn from or denied to

schools or school districts that do not meet the requirements of

Sections 2 3-104.4, 3 11-103, 6 11-103.6, 28 18-113.1, 29 18-113.2,

30 18-113.3, 44, 45, 46, 47, 48 18-114.15, and 49 5-141 of this act

title, and until March 31, 2027, the Commission for Educational

Quality and Accountability, and beginning April 1, 2027, the State

Board of Education shall take action as required by this act section

Req. No. 912 Page 21

to e nsure that students affected are enrolled in schools that are

able to maintain state accreditation. Nothing herein shall be

construed as prohibiting the withdrawing or denial of accreditation

for failure to meet requirements as elsewhere provided by law.

SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-104.4, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 3-104.4. A. The Until March 31, 2027, the Commission

for Educational Quality and Accountability, and beginning April 1,

2027, the State Board of Education shall adopt standards for the

accreditation of the public schools in this state according to the

requirements of Section 3-104.3 et seq. of this title, to be

effective as set forth in Section 3-104.3 et seq. of this title.

The accreditation standards shall incorporate the curricular

standards established pursuant to Section 11-103.6 of this title.

The accreditation standards shall equal or exceed nationally

recognized accreditation standards to the extent that the standards

are consistent with an academic results oriented approach to

accreditation. The accreditation adopted by the State Commission

for Educational Quality and Accountability until March 31, 2027, and

beginning April 1, 2027, the accreditation adopted by the Board

shall encompass accreditation for elementary schools, middle

schools, junior high schools, and high schools. The accreditation

standards shall be made available for public inspection at the

offices of the Office of Educational Quality and Accountability

Req. No. 912 Page 22

unti l March 31, 2027, and beginning April 1, 2027, at the offices of

the State Department of Education.

B. Standards for accreditation adopted by the Commission for

Educational Quality and Accountability until March 31, 2027, and

beginning April 1, 2027, standards for accreditation adopted by the

State Board of Education shall include standards relating to the

provision of school counselors to the public school children of this

state. The Until March 31, 2027, the Commission, and beginning

April 1, 2027, the State Board of Education shall require each local

school district to provide information regarding the number of

counselors serving each school site, the duties of all such

counselors including all administrative duties, the number of

students served by each counselor, and information regarding the

number of counselors employed per elementary school, middle school,

junior high school, and high school.

C. Except as otherwise provided, schools shall meet the

accreditation standards as a condition of continued accreditation.

Nothing herein shall be construed as preventing changes to the

adopted standards by the Commission for Educational Quality and

Accountability until March 31, 2027, and by the State Board of

Education beginning April 1, 2027, pursuant to the Administrative

Procedures Act. The accreditation standards shall provide for

warnings, probation, or nonaccredited status for schools that fail

to meet the standards. The Until March 31, 2027, the Office of

Req. No. 912 Page 23

Educ ational Quality and Accountability, and beginning April 1, 2027,

the Department shall investigate a complaint of failure to provide

educational services or failure to comply with accreditation

standards within thirty (30) days of receiving the complaint. If

the Office of Educational Quality and Accountability until March 31,

2027, and beginning April 1, 2027, the Department determines that a

school has failed to comply with the accreditation standards, the

Office until March 31, 2027, and beginning April 1, 2027, the

Department shall report the recommended warning, probation, or

nonaccredited accreditation status to the Commission for Educational

Quality and Accountability until March 31, 2027, and beginning April

1, 2027, to the State Board of Education within ninety (90) days.

If a school does not take action to comply with the accreditation

standards within ninety (90) days after a report is filed by the

Office until March 31, 2027, and beginning April 1, 2027, by the

Department, the Commission for Educational Quality and

Accountability until March 31, 2027, and beginning April 1, 2027,

the Board shall withdraw accreditation for the school. The State

Board Until March 31, 2027, the Commission’s accreditation

regulations, and beginning April 1, 2027, the Board’s accreditation

regulations shall provide for warnings and for assistance to schools

and school districts whenever there is reason to believe a school is

in danger of losing its state accreditation.



Req. No. 912 Page 24

D. If one or more school sites fail to receive accreditation as

required pursuant to this section or subsequently lose

accreditation, the Commission for Educational Quality and

Accountability until March 31, 2027, and beginning April 1, 2027,

the State Board of Education shall close the school and reassign the

students to accredited schools within the district or shall annex

the district to one or more other districts in which the students

can be educated in accredited schools.

E. Standards for accreditation adopted by the Commission for

Educational Quality and Accountability until March 31, 2027, and

beginning April 1, 2027, by the State Board of Education shall

include standards relating to the provision of educational services

provided in partial hospitalization programs, day treatment

programs, day hospital programs, residential treatment programs, and

emergency shelter programs for persons between the ages of three (3)

and twenty-one (21) years of age. The accreditation standards shall

apply to on-site and off-site educational services provided by

public school districts or state-accredited private schools. Each

school which is providing or is required to provide educational

services for students placed in a program as described in this

subsection shall be actively monitored by the State Department of

Education. The Department shall determine on an ongoing basis if

the educational program and services are in compliance with the

accreditation standards.

Req. No. 912 Page 25

F. The Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability

until March 31, 2027, and beginning April 1, 2027, the State Board

of Education shall provide assistance to districts in considering

the possibility of meeting accreditation requirements through the

use of nontraditional means of instruction. The State Commission

until March 31, 2027, and beginning April 1, 2027, the Board shall

also assist districts in forming cooperatives and making

arrangements for the use of satellite instruction or other

instructional technologies to the extent that use of such

instructional means meets accreditation standards.

G. 1. Accreditation shall not be withdrawn from or denied nor

shall a penalty be assessed against a school or school district for

failing to meet the media materials and equipment standards, media

program expenditure standards, and media personnel standards as set

forth in the accreditation standards adopted by the Commission for

Educational Quality and Accountability until March 31, 2027, and

beginning April 1, 2027, by the Board.

2. The provisions of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall cease

to be effective during the fiscal year which begins on the July 1

immediately succeeding the legislative session during which the

measure appropriating monies to the State Board of Education for the

financial support of public schools is enacted as law and such

appropriation amount is at least Fifty Million Dollars

($50,000,000.00) greater than the amount of money appropriated to

Req. No. 912 Page 26

the State Board of Education for the financial support of public

schools for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2019, pursuant to

Chapter 146, O.S.L. 2018. Provided, the Fifty Million Dollars

($50,000,000.00) shall not include any amount of appropriations

dedicated for support or certified employee salary increases.

Accreditation shall not be withdrawn from or denied nor shall a

penalty be assessed against a school or school district for failing

to meet the media personnel standards as set forth in accreditation

standards adopted by the Commission until March 31, 2027, and

beginning April 1, 2027, by the Board.

H. 1. The State Commission for Educational Quality and

Accountability until March 31, 2027, and beginning April 1, 2027,

the Board shall not assess a financial penalty against any school

district which is given a deficiency in accreditation status during

any fiscal year as provided for in this subsection.

2. Beginning with the fiscal year which begins July 1, 2021, if

the amount of money appropriated to the State Board of Education for

the financial support of public schools including funds apportioned

pursuant to Section 2 426 of this act Title 63 of the Oklahoma

Statutes, is at least One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00)

greater than the amount of money appropriated to the State Board of

Education for the financial support of public schools for the fiscal

year ending June 30, 2019, pursuant to Chapter 146, O.S.L. 2018, a

financial penalty shall be assessed against any school districts

Req. No. 912 Page 27

that do not comply with the class size limitations for kindergarten

as provided for in Section 18-113.2 of this title and class size

limitations for grade one as provided for in subsection A of Section

18-113.1 of this title. Provided, the One Hundred Million Dollars

($100,000,000.00) shall not include any amount of appropriations

dedicated for support or certified employee salary increases.

3. The State Department of Education shall submit a report on

statewide classroom sizes to the President Pro Tempore of the

Oklahoma State Senate and the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of

Representatives no later than January 1, 2022.

I. Except as provided for in subsection J of this section,

beginning with the 2019-2020 school year, evaluations of schools to

determine whether they meet the accreditation standards set forth in

accordance with this section shall occur once every four (4) years

on a schedule adopted by the Commission for Educational Quality and

Accountability until March 31, 2027, and beginning April 1, 2027, by

the State Board of Education. The Commission until March 31, 2027,

and beginning April 1, 2027, the Board may interrupt the evaluation

schedule provided in this subsection for reasons including a change

in the superintendent of the school district; determination that one

or more school district board members have not met the continuing

education requirements as defined by this title; determination that

the school district falsified information submitted to any public

city, county, state, or federal official or agency; initiation of an

Req. No. 912 Page 28

inve stigation by the Commission until March 31, 2027, and by the

Board beginning April 1, 2027, or a law enforcement agency; or other

determination by the Commission until March 31, 2027, and beginning

April 1, 2027, by the Board that standards for accreditation are not

being met by the school district. The schedule adopted by the

Commission until March 31, 2027, and beginning April 1, 2027, by the

Board shall allow for school districts receiving no deficiencies for

two (2) consecutive years to be reviewed for accreditation less than

annually. Provided, however, that schools shall be evaluated

annually for the purposes of:

1. Local, state, and federal funding;

2. Health and safety;

3. Certification requirements for teachers, principals, and

superintendents;

4. School board governance, including instructional and

continuing education requirements for school board members; and

5. Any other requirements under state or federal law.

J. Beginning with the 2019-2020 school year, if a public school

receives a deficiency on its accreditation report, the public school

shall be evaluated annually to determine if it meets the

accreditation standards set forth in accordance with this section.

If the public school receives no deficiencies for two (2)

consecutive years, the public school shall be subject to the

evaluation timeline established in subsection I of this section.

Req. No. 912 Page 29

SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-116.2, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 3-116.2. A. Effective January 1, 2013, there is hereby

created the Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability.

The membership of the Commission shall consist of:

1. The Secretary of Education, who shall serve as the chair of

the Commission;

2. One member appointed by the Governor, with the advice and

consent of the Senate, representing business and industry from an

Oklahoma employer with five hundred (500) or fewer employees;

3. One member, appointed by the Governor, with the advice and

consent of the Senate, who is a parent of a child enrolled in a

public school in this state;

4. One member, appointed by the Governor, with the advice and

consent of the Senate, who is an administrator of a public school

district;

5. One member, appointed by the Governor, with the advice and

consent of the Senate, who shall represent higher education teacher

education programs;

6. One member appointed by the Governor, with the advice and

consent of the Senate, who shall be an active classroom teacher in

kindergarten through grade six; and





Req. No. 912 Page 30

7. One member appointed by the Governor, with the advice and

consent of the Senate, who shall be an active classroom teacher in

grades seven through twelve.

The terms of the initial appointed members shall commence on

January 1, 2013, and shall end on June 30, 2014. The terms of

subsequently appointed members shall commence on July 1 of each year

following the election of the Governor thereafter and shall be for

four (4) years. If a vacancy occurs, the vacancy shall be filled

for the unexpired term in the same manner as the office was

previously filled.

B. A quorum of the Commission, which shall consist of four

members, shall be present in order for the Commission to transact

any business. Members shall be reimbursed for travel in the

performance of their official duties in accordance with the State

Travel Reimbursement Act.

C. Prior to July 1, 2013, the Commission shall meet to organize

and plan for the assumption of the powers and duties of the

Education Oversight Board and the Oklahoma Commission for Teacher

Preparation.

D. Beginning July 1, 2013, the Commission shall assume the

following duties:

1. Oversee implementation of the provisions of Enrolled House

Bill No. 1017 of the 1st Extraordinary Session of the 42nd Oklahoma

Legislature;

Req. No. 912 Page 31

2. Implementation of the provisions of the Oklahoma Teacher

Preparation Act as provided for in law;

3. Make recommendations to the Governor and Legislature on

methods to achieve an aligned, seamless system from preschool

through postsecondary education; and

4. Set performance levels and corresponding cut scores pursuant

to the Oklahoma School Testing Program Act and as provided for in

Section 1210.541 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.

E. Beginning July 1, 2013, the Commission shall govern the

operation of the Office of Educational Quality and Accountability

created in Section 3-117 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this

title.

F. 1. Beginning July 1, 2014, the Commission shall assume the

following duties of the Oklahoma Commission for Teacher Preparation

according to the provisions of the Oklahoma Teacher Preparation Act:

a. approval and accreditation of teacher education

programs, and

b. assessment of candidates for licensure and

certification.

2. To implement the provisions of this subsection the

Commission shall:

a. include the State Board of Education in the process,

b. review and assess approved, accredited, and new

programs of teacher education, and

Req. No. 912 Page 32

c. encourage studies and research designed to improve

teacher education.

G. Upon the effective date of this act and until March 31,

2027, the Commission shall assume the following duties:

1. Adoption of standards for the accreditation of public

schools in this state pursuant to the provisions of Section 3-104.4

of this title; and

2. Evaluating schools to determine whether they meet the

accreditation standards adopted by the Commission.

H. The Commission shall promulgate rules to implement the

provisions of this act.

SECTION 6. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

SECTION 7. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-1-912 EB 1/14/2025 3:50:41 PM













Req. No. 912 Page 33